Massachusetts, session 194th, H1110.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 184 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by striking out section 17B ½ and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
No mortgagee who makes a loan to a first-time home loan borrower, to be secured by a
mortgage on owner-occupied, 1 to 4 family residential property in the commonwealth, shall
make a subprime loan at a variable or adjustable rate of interest unless the mortgagor
affirmatively opts in writing for the variable or adjustable rate subprime loan and receives
certification from a counselor with a third-party nonprofit organization that the mortgagor has
received counseling on the advisability of the loan transaction; provided, further that said third
party nonprofit organization shall have been approved by: (1) the United States Department of
Housing and Urban Development; (2) a housing financing agency of the commonwealth; (3) the
of 2

Massachusetts Homeownership Collaborative; (4) or the regulatory agency which has
jurisdiction over the mortgagee. The commissioner of the division of banks shall maintain a list
of approved counseling programs. At or before closing such a loan, the mortgagee shall obtain
evidence that the mortgagor has completed an approved counseling program. If such subprime
mortgage loan is made by a mortgagee in violation of this section, the variable or adjustable rate
terms of the loan shall not be enforceable and the mortgagee shall only be entitled to collect an
interest rate equal to the lesser of the original interest rate, including any discounted rate, or the
current adjusted interest rate throughout the remaining term of the loan. The commissioner of
banks shall issue directives or guidelines or adopt regulations to administer and carry out this
section and to further define the terms used in this section.
A first-time home loan that is a Qualified Mortgage pursuant to 12 CFR 1026.43(b)(1)
which meets the specifications of 12 CFR 1026.43(e)(1)(i) shall be exempt from this section as
of January 1, 2022.
of 2